Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7012
Tax credit; application; approval; limitation.

(1) If the department determines that an application is complete and that the taxpayer qualifies for tax credits, the department shall approve the application within the limits set forth in this section and shall certify the amount of tax credits approved to the taxpayer.

(2) The department may approve up to one million dollars in tax credits in fiscal year 2024-25 and each fiscal year thereafter. Once credits have reached the annual limit for any fiscal year, no additional credits shall be allowed for such fiscal year. Credits shall be prorated among the credit requests received on the day the annual limit is exceeded.

Laws 2023, LB727, § 4;

Laws 2024, LB937, § 81;

Laws 2025, LB208, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB650, § 55.